Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1986 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1986, 1991, 1994, 2002, 2012, and 2020 to make other minor word changes under
AS

01.05.031

.

Administrative Code. —

For health and social services, see 7 AAC.